District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Green Housing Coordination Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Energy standards for subsidized affordable housing.
The Housing Production Trust Fund Act of 1988, effective March 16, 1989 (D.C. Law 7-
202; D.C. Official Code §§ 42-2801 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 6 to read as
follows:
“Sec. 6. Net zero energy requirements for subsidized projects.
“(a) Any request, excluding substantial rehabilitation as that term is defined in section
103(34) of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
Official Code § 42–3501.03(34)), for housing proposals involving the Fund shall include a

requirement that proposals for new construction receiving Fund support must be designed with
the intent to obtain “Enterprise Green Communities Certification Plus” as defined in the EGCC
or an equivalent standard as determined by the Department in consultation with the Department
of Buildings.
“(b) Any request, excluding substantial rehabilitation as that term is defined in section
103(34) of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
Official Code § 42–3501.03(34)), for housing proposals involving the Fund shall include a
requirement that proposals for new construction receiving Fund support be all-electric.
“(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the applicability of any other
environmental standards, including the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007
(D.C. Law 16-234; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.01 et seq.).
“(d) This section shall expire upon the effective date of final regulations promulgated
pursuant to section 2(b)(1) of the Clean Energy DC Building Code Amendment Act of 2022,
effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-177; D.C. Official Code § 6-1453.01(b)(1)).
“(e) For purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “All-electric” means that no combustion equipment is included in the
building project, except for emergency backup power.
(2) “EGCC” means the current Enterprise Green Communities Criteria issued by
Enterprise Community Partners.”.
Sec. 3. Coordination and transparency in residential net zero energy rulemaking.
The Clean Energy DC Building Code Amendment Act of 2022, effective September 21,
2022 (D.C. Law 24-177; D.C. Official Code § 6-1453.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 2a to read as follows:

“Sec. 2a. Report on barriers to net zero energy ready affordable housing development.
“(a)(1) No later than March 1, 2026, and every 6 months thereafter, the Department shall
submit to the Council a report detailing its progress toward developing the regulations required
by section 2.
“(2) Each report must include a discussion of major questions that the Department
needs to resolve before it can issue the regulations, plans to resolve those questions, and
comments on any existing laws that pose significant challenges to successful development and
implementation of the regulations. The Department may also include recommended changes to
existing laws that would allow substantial affordable housing development and preservation to
continue while still securing meaningful, immediate reductions in energy waste, greenhouse gas
emissions, and onsite fossil fuel combustion.
“(b) In preparing each report required under this section, the Department shall hold at
least one public meeting with the Department of Energy and Environment, local climate
advocacy organizations, and housing development and preservation professionals with
substantial experience delivering high-efficiency projects in the District.
“(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to establish a new cause of action to
challenge the validity of any regulations issued pursuant to section 2(b)(1).
“(d) This section shall expire upon the effective date of final regulations promulgated
pursuant to section 2(b)(1).”.
Sec. 4. Energy standards for subsidized housing.
Section 3(a) of the Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-
234; D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.02(a)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (3)(C) is amended to read as follows:

“(C)(i) In the case of new construction or substantial rehabilitation, as that
term is defined in section 103(34) of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985
(D.C. Law 6-10; D.C. Official Code § 42–3501.03(34)), in which a roof replacement or repair of
50% or more of the roof area is within the scope of the project in accordance with the District of
Columbia Building Code (Title 12A of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations), the
developer shall incorporate rooftop renewable energy systems on-site wherever feasible;
provided, that the Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative
Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.),
shall issue rules identifying common circumstances where it is infeasible to incorporate rooftop
renewable energy systems pursuant to this subparagraph; provided further, that any delay or
failure by the Mayor in issuing such rules shall not limit the applicability of this sub-
subparagraph.
“(ii) In the case of shelter facilities, maintain net zero energy
compliance.”.
(b) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “shall maintain net zero energy
compliance and fulfill” and inserting the phrase “shall fulfill” in its place.
100 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
101 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
102 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
103 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
104 Sec. 6. Effective date.
105 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
106 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as

107 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
108 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
109 Columbia Register.